Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202669-2443
Violations; revocation of permit; when.

(1) A permitholder convicted of a violation of section 28-1202.03, 28-1202.04, or 69-2442 may have his or her permit revoked.

(2) A permitholder convicted of a violation of section 28-1202.01 or 28-1202.02 that occurred on property owned by the state or any political subdivision of the state may also have his or her permit revoked. A permitholder convicted of a violation of section 28-1202.01 or 28-1202.02 that did not occur on property owned by the state or any political subdivision of the state shall not have his or her permit revoked for a first offense but may have his or her permit revoked for any second or subsequent offense.

Laws 2006, LB 454, § 17;

Laws 2007, LB97, § 2;

Laws 2012, LB807, § 6;

Laws 2023, LB77, § 21.